Maryland, session 2026, HB0323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
13–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0323*

HOUSE BILL 323
(d) “Deception” means a misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact
relating to services rendered, disposition of property, or the use of property intended to
benefit a susceptible adult or older adult.
(e) (1) “Financial exploitation” means an act taken by a person who:
(i) Stands in a position of trust and confidence with a susceptible
adult or older adult and who knowingly obtains or uses, or endeavors to obtain or use, a
susceptible adult’s or older adult’s funds, assets, or property with the intent to temporarily
or permanently deprive the susceptible adult or older adult of the use, benefit, or possession
of the funds, assets, or property for the benefit of someone other than the susceptible adult
or older adult, in such a manner that is not fair and reasonable;
(ii) By deception, false pretenses, false promises, larceny,
embezzlement, misapplication, conversion, intimidation, coercion, isolation, excessive
persuasion, or similar actions and tactics, obtains or uses, or endeavors to obtain or use, a
susceptible adult’s or older adult’s funds, assets, or property with the intent to temporarily
or permanently deprive the susceptible adult or older adult of the use, benefit, or possession
of the funds, assets, or property for the benefit of someone other than the susceptible adult
or older adult; or
(iii) Knows or should know that a susceptible adult or older adult
lacks capacity to consent and who obtains or uses, or endeavors to obtain or use, the
susceptible adult’s or older adult’s funds, assets, or property with the intent to temporarily
or permanently deprive the susceptible adult or older adult of the use, benefit, or possession
of the funds, assets, or property for the benefit of someone other than the susceptible adult
or older adult.
(2) “Financial exploitation” includes:
(i) Breach of a fiduciary relationship resulting in the unauthorized
appropriation, sale, or transfer of property;
(ii) Unauthorized taking of personal assets;
(iii) Misappropriation, misuse, or transfer of assets belonging to a
susceptible adult or older adult from a personal or joint account; and
(iv) Intentional failure to effectively use a susceptible adult’s or older
adult’s income and assets for the necessities required for the susceptible adult’s or older
adult’s support and maintenance.
(3) “Financial exploitation” does not include an individual’s good–faith use
of a susceptible adult’s or older adult’s assets, including for the purposes of establishing
and implementing an estate plan intended to reduce taxes or to maximize eligibility for
public benefits in order to preserve assets for an identified or identifiable person.

HOUSE BILL 323 3
(g) “Intimidation” means a communication, by word or act, that a susceptible
adult or older adult will suffer physical violence or emotional injury or will be deprived of
food, nutrition, clothing, shelter, supervision, medicine, medical services, money, social
interaction, or emotional or financial support.
(j) “Position of trust and confidence” means a relationship, whether formed by a
formal or informal agreement between a susceptible adult or older adult and another
person or recognized by a formal declaration or court order, in which:
(1) A person is entrusted with the use or management of the property or
assets of the susceptible adult or older adult, or the susceptible adult’s or older adult’s care;
or
(2) There is a special confidence or trust placed in a person who, in equity
and good conscience, is bound to act in good faith and with due regard to the interests of
the susceptible adult or older adult.
(k) “Susceptible adult” means an adult who is unable to perform, without
prompting or assistance, one or more activities of daily living, is unable to protect the
adult’s rights, or has diminished executive functioning, due to:
(1) Advanced age;
(2) Mental, emotional, sensory, or physical disability or disease;
(3) Impaired mobility;
(4) Habitual drunkenness;
(5) Addiction to drugs; or
(6) Hospitalization.
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SUBJECT
TO EARLY WITHDRAWAL PENALTIES UNDER § 72(T) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE.
(3) “FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
13–601 OF THE ESTATES AND TRUSTS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 323
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, AN ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER
MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO
THE LESSER OF:
(1) THE STATE INCOME TAX ATTRIBUTABLE TO AN EARLY
WITHDRAWAL OF RETIREMENT FUNDS DUE TO FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION; OR
(2) FEDERAL TAX PENALTIES PAID BY THE ELIGIBLE TAXPAYER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 72(T) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE THAT ARE
ATTRIBUTABLE TO AN EARLY WITHDRAWAL OF RETIREMENT FUNDS DUE TO
FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION.
(C) WHEN CLAIMING A CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION, AN ELIGIBLE
TAXPAYER SHALL PROVIDE:
(1) INFORMATION DEMONSTRATING A LOSS RESULTING FROM
FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION, INCLUDING DOCUMENTATION FROM:
(I) ADULT PROTECTIVE SERVICES;
(II) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY;
(III) A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION THAT HAS REPORTED
SUSPECTED FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION UNDER THE MARYLAND STATUTE AGAINST
FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION (SAFE) ACT; OR
(IV) A COURT ORDER, A RESTITUTION ORDER, OR ANY OTHER
COURT ISSUED DOCUMENTATION RELATED TO THE FINANCIAL LOSS; AND
(2) AN AFFIDAVIT ATTESTING THAT FEDERAL TAX PENALTIES WERE
INCURRED AS A RESULT OF EARLY WITHDRAWAL OF RETIREMENT FUNDS DUE TO
FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION.
(D) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR
EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, THE UNUSED AMOUNT
OF THE CREDIT MAY NOT BE CARRIED OVER TO ANY OTHER TAXABLE YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.